Montana, session 2025, HB595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Montana correctional education program -- instructor qualifications. (1) There is a
Montana correctional education program within the department of corrections. The Montana correctional
education program shall offer a program for inmates to participate in opportunities in the state prison to further
their education, including but not limited to programs to attain a high school equivalency diploma and to
participate in adult basic education.
(2) To be eligible to be an instructor for a high school equivalency diploma program or an adult
basic education program in the state prison, a person:
(a) must be 18 years of age or older;
(b) must be of good moral character; and
(c) shall provide proof that the person has at least one of the following qualifications:
(i) completion of an associate degree in any field;
(ii) completion of a bachelor's degree in any field;
(iii) a teaching certificate issued by another state; or
(iv) prior teaching experience, including prior military training and experience pursuant to 37-1-145.
(3) The department of corrections may not require that an instructor hold a Montana teacher or
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 595
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 595
specialist certificate issued by the superintendent of public instruction.
(4) The department of corrections may adopt policies to determine which inmates are eligible to
participate in the Montana correctional education program.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
53, chapter 30, part 1, and the provisions of Title 53, chapter 30, part 1, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 595
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 595, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 595
INTRODUCED BY F. NAVE, K. SEEKINS-CROWE
AN ACT REQUIRING THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS TO OFFER A MONTANA CORRECTIONAL
EDUCATION PROGRAM FOR INMATES; REQUIRING THE CORRECTIONAL EDUCATION PROGRAM TO
PROVIDE HIGH SCHOOL EQUIVALENCY AND ADULT BASIC EDUCATION PROGRAMS; PROVIDING
QUALIFICATIONS FOR AN INSTRUCTOR OF THE HIGH SCHOOL EQUIVALENCY AND ADULT BASIC
EDUCATION PROGRAMS; REQUIRING THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS TO ADOPT CERTAIN
POLICIES; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.”